Massachusetts, session 194th, H2505.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 201F the following 
2 chapter:- 
3  CHAPTER 201G. 
4  MASSACHUSETTS END OF LIFE OPTIONS ACT 
5  Section 1. For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following 
6 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
7  “Adult”, an individual who is 18 years of age or older. 
8  “Attending physician”, an attending physician as defined in section 1 of chapter 201D.  
9  “Consulting physician”, a physician who is qualified by specialty or experience to make a 
10 professional diagnosis and prognosis regarding a terminally ill patient’s condition. 

2 of 18 11  “Counseling”, one or more consultations as necessary between a licensed mental health 
12 care professional and a patient for the purpose of determining that the patient is mentally capable 
13 and not suffering from a psychiatric or psychological disorder or depression causing impaired 
14 judgment. 
15   “Guardian”, an individual who has qualified as a guardian of an incapacitated person 
16 pursuant to court appointment and includes a limited guardian, special guardian and temporary 
17 guardian, but excludes one who is merely a guardian ad litem as defined in section 5-101 of 
18 article V of chapter 190B. Guardianship shall not include a health care proxy as defined by 
19 chapter 201D. 
20  “Health care entity”, a general hospital, medical clinic, nursing home, hospice or any 
21 other entity. A health care entity does not include providers. 
22  “Health care provider”, an individual licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or 
23 permitted by law to diagnose and treat medical conditions, and prescribe and dispense 
24 medication, including controlled substances. 
25  “Incapacitated person”, an individual who for reasons other than advanced age or being a 
26 minor, has a clinically diagnosed condition that results in an inability to receive and evaluate 
27 information or make or communicate decisions to such an extent that the individual lacks the 
28 ability to meet essential requirements for physical health, safety, or self-care, even with 
29 appropriate technological assistance. An “incapacitated person” shall be defined consistent with 
30 the definition of an individual described in section 5-101 of article V of chapter 190B. 
31  “Informed decision”, a decision by a mentally capable individual to request and obtain a 
32 prescription for medication pursuant to this chapter that the individual may self-administer to 

3 of 18 33 bring about a peaceful death, after being fully informed by the attending physician and 
34 consulting physician of: 
35  (a) The individual’s diagnosis and prognosis; 
36  (b) The potential risk associated with taking the medication to be prescribed; 
37  (c) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed; 
38  (d) The feasible end-of-life care and treatment options for the individual’s terminal 
39 disease, including but not limited to comfort care, palliative care, hospice care and pain control, 
40 and the risks and benefits of each; and 
41  (e) The individual’s right to withdraw a request pursuant to this chapter, or consent for 
42 any other treatment, at any time. 
43  “Licensed mental health care professional”, a treatment provider who is a psychiatrist, 
44 psychologist, psychiatric social worker or psychiatric nurse and others who by virtue of 
45 education, credentials and experience are permitted by law to evaluate and care for the mental 
46 health needs of patients. 
47  “Medical aid in dying”, the practice of evaluating a request, determining qualification, 
48 performing the duties in sections 6, 7 and 8, and providing a prescription to a qualified patient 
49 pursuant to this chapter.  
50  “Medically confirmed,” the medical opinion of the attending physician has been 
51 confirmed by a consulting physician who has examined the patient and the patient’s relevant 
52 medical records. 

4 of 18 53  “Medical aid in dying medication”, medication to bring about a peaceful death. 
54  “Mentally capable”, in the opinion of the attending physician and licensed mental health 
55 care professional, the individual requesting medication pursuant to this chapter has the ability to 
56 make and communicate an informed decision.  
57  “Palliative care”, a health care treatment as defined in section 227 of chapter 111, 
58 including interdisciplinary end-of-life care and consultation with patients and family members, to 
59 prevent or relieve pain and suffering and to enhance the patient’s quality of life, including 
60 hospice care. 
61  “Patient”, an individual who has received health care services from a health care provider 
62 for treatment of a medical condition. 
63  “Physician”, a doctor of medicine or osteopathy licensed to practice medicine in 
64 Massachusetts by the board of registration in medicine. 
65  “Qualified patient”, a mentally capable adult who is a resident of Massachusetts, has been 
66 diagnosed as being terminally ill, and has satisfied the requirements of this chapter. 
67  “Resident”, an individual who demonstrates residency in Massachusetts by presenting 
68 one form of identification which may include but is not limited to: 
69  (a) possession of a Massachusetts driver’s license; 
70  (b) proof of registration to vote in Massachusetts; 
71  (c) proof that the individual owns or leases real property in Massachusetts; 

5 of 18 72  (d) proof that the individual has resided in a Massachusetts health care facility for at least 
73 3 months; 
74  (e) a bill from a bank or mortgage company, utility company, doctor, or hospital; 
75  (f) a W-2 form, property or excise tax bill, or Social Security Administration or other 
76 pension or retirement annual benefits summary statement dated within the current or prior year; 
77  (g) a MassHealth or Medicare benefit statement; or 
78  (h) filing of a Massachusetts tax return for the most recent tax year. 
79  “Self-administer”, a qualified patient’s act of ingesting medication obtained under this 
80 chapter. 
81  “Terminally ill”, having a terminal illness or condition which can reasonably be expected 
82 to cause death within 6 months, whether or not treatment is provided. 
83  Section 2. (a) A patient wishing to receive a prescription for medication under this 
84 chapter shall make an oral request to the patient's attending physician. The patient shall also 
85 submit a written request to the patient's attending physician in substantially the form set in 
86 section 4 no less than 15 days after making the oral request. 
87  (b) A terminally ill patient may voluntarily make an oral request for medical aid in dying 
88 and a prescription for medication that the patient can choose to self-administer to bring about a 
89 peaceful death if the patient: 
90  (1) is a mentally capable adult; 
91  (2) is a resident of Massachusetts; and 

6 of 18 92  (3) has been determined by the patient’s attending physician to be terminally ill. 
93  (c) A patient may provide a written request for medical aid in dying and a prescription for 
94 medication that the patient can choose to self-administer to bring about a peaceful death if the 
95 patient: 
96  (1) has met the requirements in subsection (b); 
97  (2) has been determined by a consulting physician to be terminally ill; and 
98  (3) has had no less than 15 days pass after making the oral request. 
99  (d) A patient shall not qualify under this chapter if the patient has a guardian. 
100  (e) A patient shall not qualify under this chapter solely because of age or disability. 
101  Section 3. (a) A valid written request must be witnessed by at least 2 individuals who, in 
102 the presence of the patient, attest that to the best of their knowledge and belief that patient is: 
103  (1) personally known to the witnesses or has provided proof of identity; 
104  (2) acting voluntarily; and 
105  (3) not being coerced to sign the request. 
106  (b) At least 1 of the witnesses shall be an individual who is not: 
107  (1) a relative of the patient by blood, marriage or adoption; 
108  (2) an individual who at the time the request is signed would be entitled to any portion of 
109 the estate of the qualified patient upon death under any will or by operation of law; 

7 of 18 110  (3) financially responsible for the medical care of the patient; or 
111  (4) an owner, operator or employee of a health care facility where the qualified patient is 
112 receiving medical treatment or is a resident. 
113  (c) The patient's attending physician at the time the request is signed shall not serve as a 
114 witness. 
115  Section 4. A written request and witness declaration under section 2 shall substantially 
116 take the following form: 
117  REQUEST FOR MEDICAL AID IN DYING MEDICATION PURSUANT TO THE 
118 MASSACHUSETTS END OF LIFE OPTIONS ACT 
119  I,. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , am an adult of sound mind and a resident of the State of 
120 Massachusetts. I am suffering from . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , which my attending physician has 
121 determined is a terminal illness or condition which can reasonably be expected to cause death 
122 within 6 months. This diagnosis has been medically confirmed as required by law. 
123  I have been fully informed of my diagnosis, prognosis, the nature of the medical aid in 
124 dying medication to be prescribed and potential associated risks, the expected result, and the 
125 feasible alternatives and additional treatment opportunities, including, but not limited to, comfort 
126 care, palliative care, hospice care, and pain control. 
127  I request that my attending physician prescribe medical aid in dying medication that will 
128 end my life in a peaceful manner if I choose to take it, and I authorize my attending physician to 
129 contact any pharmacist to fill the prescription. 

8 of 18 130  I understand that I have the right to rescind this request at any time. I understand the full 
131 import of this request and I expect to die if I take the medical aid in dying medication to be 
132 prescribed. I further understand that although most deaths occur within three hours, my death 
133 may take longer and my physician has counseled me about this possibility. I make this request 
134 voluntarily, without reservation, and without being coerced, and I accept full responsibility for 
135 my actions. 
136  Signed:. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Dated:. . . . . . . . . . . . . . 
137  DECLARATION OF WITNESSES 
138  By signing below, on the date the patient named above signs, we declare that the patient 
139 making and signing the above request is personally known to us or has provided proof of 
140 identity, and appears not to be under duress, fraud, or undue influence. 
141  Printed Name of Witness 1: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 
142  Signature of Witness l/Date:. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 
143  Printed Name of Witness 2:. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 
144  Signature of Witness 2/Date:. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 
145  Section 5. (a) A qualified patient may at any time rescind the request for medication 
146 under this chapter without regard to the qualified patient's mental state. 
147  (b) A prescription for medication under this chapter shall not be written without the 
148 attending physician offering the qualified patient an opportunity to rescind the request for 
149 medication. 

9 of 18 150  Section 6. (a) The attending physician shall: 
151  (1) make the initial determination of whether an adult patient: 
152  (i) is a resident of this state; 
153  (ii) is terminally ill; 
154  (iii) is mentally capable; and 
155  (iv) has voluntarily made the oral and written request for medical aid in dying. 
156  (2) ensure that the patient is making an informed decision by discussing with the patient: 
157  (i) the patient’s medical diagnosis; 
158  (ii) the patient’s prognosis; 
159  (iii) the potential risks associated with taking the medication to be prescribed; 
160  (iv) the probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed; and 
161  (v) the feasible alternatives and additional treatment opportunities, including, but not 
162 limited to, palliative care and hospice care. 
163  (3) refer the patient to a consulting physician to medically confirm the diagnosis and 
164 prognosis and for a determination that the patient is mentally capable and is acting voluntarily; 
165  (4) refer the patient for counseling pursuant to section 8; 
166  (5) ensure that sections 6 through 8, inclusive, are followed; 

10 of 18 167  (6) have a prior clinical relationship with the patient, unless the patient’s attending 
168 physician is unwilling to participate; 
169  (7) recommend that the patient notify the patient's family or any person who plays a 
170 significant role in an individual’s life; 
171  (8) recommend that the patient complete a Medical Order for Life-Sustaining Treatment 
172 form; 
173  (9) counsel the patient about the importance of: 
174  (i) having another individual present when the patient takes the medication prescribed 
175 under this chapter; and 
176  (ii) not taking the medication in a public place; 
177  (10) inform the patient that the patient may rescind the request for medication at any time 
178 and in any manner; 
179  (11) verify, immediately prior to writing the prescription for medication, that the patient 
180 is making an informed decision; 
181  (12) educate the patient on how to self-administer the medication; 
182  (13) fulfill the medical record documentation requirements in section 13; 
183  (14) ensure that all appropriate steps are carried out in accordance with this chapter 
184 before writing a prescription for medication for a qualified patient; and 

11 of 18 185  (15) (i) dispense medications directly, including ancillary medications intended to 
186 minimize the qualified patient's discomfort, if the attending physician is authorized under law to 
187 dispense and has a current drug enforcement administration certificate; or 
188  (ii) with the qualified patient’s written consent: 
189  (A) contact a pharmacist, inform the pharmacist of the prescription, and 
190  (B) deliver the written prescription personally, by mail or by otherwise permissible 
191 electronic communication to the pharmacist, who will dispense the medications directly to either 
192 the qualified patient, the attending physician or an expressly identified agent of the qualified 
193 patient. Medications dispensed pursuant to this paragraph shall not be dispensed by mail or other 
194 form of courier. 
195  (b) The attending physician may sign the patient's death certificate which shall list the 
196 underlying terminal disease as the cause of death. 
197  Section 7. (a) Before a patient may be considered a qualified patient under this chapter 
198 the consulting physician shall: 
199  (1) examine the patient and the patient's relevant medical records; 
200  (2) confirm in writing the attending physician's diagnosis that the patient is suffering 
201 from a terminal illness; and 
202  (3) verify that the patient: 
203  (i) is mentally capable; 
204  (ii) is acting voluntarily; and 

12 of 18 205  (iii) has made an informed decision. 
206  Section 8. (a) An attending physician shall refer a patient who has requested medical aid 
207 in dying medication under this chapter to counseling to determine that the patient is not suffering 
208 from a psychiatric or psychological disorder or depression causing impaired judgment. The 
209 licensed mental health care professional shall review the medical history of the patient relevant 
210 to the patient’s current mental health and then shall submit a final written report to the attending 
211 physician. 
212  (b) The medical aid in dying medication may not be prescribed until the individual 
213 performing the counseling determines that: 
214  (1) the patient is not suffering from a psychiatric or psychological disorder or depression 
215 causing impaired judgment; and 
216  (2) there is no reason to suspect coercion in the patient’s decision-making process. 
217  Section 9. Immediately before issuing a prescription for medical aid in dying medication 
218 under this chapter the attending physician shall verify that the qualified patient is making an 
219 informed decision. 
220  Section 10. The attending physician shall recommend that a qualified patient notify the 
221 patient's family or any person who plays a significant role in an individual’s life of the patient's 
222 request for medical aid in dying medication pursuant to this chapter. A request for medical aid in 
223 dying medication shall not be denied because a patient declines or is unable to notify the family 
224 or any person who plays a significant role in an individual’s life. 

13 of 18 225  Section 11. The following items shall be documented or filed in the patient's medical 
226 record: 
227  (1) the determination and the basis for determining that a patient requesting medical aid 
228 in dying medication pursuant to this chapter is a qualified patient; 
229  (2) all oral requests by a patient for medical aid in dying medication; 
230  (3) all written requests by a patient for medical aid in dying medication made pursuant to 
231 sections 3 through 5, inclusive; 
232  (4) the attending physician's diagnosis, prognosis and determination that the patient is 
233 mentally capable, is acting voluntarily and has made an informed decision; 
234  (5) the consulting physician's diagnosis, prognosis and verification that the patient is 
235 mentally capable, is acting voluntarily and has made an informed decision; 
236  (6) a report of the outcome and determinations made during counseling; 
237  (7) the attending physician's offer before prescribing the medical aid in dying medication 
238 to allow the qualified patient to rescind the patient's request for the medication; 
239  (8) other care options that were offered to the patient, including, but not limited to, 
240 hospice and palliative care; and 
241  (9) a note by the attending physician indicating: 
242  (i) that all requirements under this chapter have been met; and 

14 of 18 243  (ii) the steps taken to carry out the request, including a notation of the medication 
244 prescribed. 
245  Section 12. Any medical aid in dying medication dispensed under this chapter that was 
246 not self-administered shall be disposed of by lawful means. The medication dispenser shall be 
247 responsible for informing the individual collecting the medication what disposal by lawful means 
248 entails. 
249  Section 13. Physicians shall keep a record of the number of requests for medical aid in 
250 dying medication; the number of prescriptions written; the number of requests rescinded; the 
251 number of qualified patients who took the medication under this chapter; the general 
252 demographic and socioeconomic characteristics of the patient, including race and ethnicity, and 
253 any physical disability of the patient. This data shall be reported to the department of public 
254 health annually. The department shall analyze the data and annually issue a public report on their 
255 findings. Except as otherwise required by law, the information collected by the department of 
256 public health is not a public record and is not available for public inspection. 
257  Section 14. (a) Any provision in a contract, will or other agreement, whether written or 
258 oral, to the extent the provision would affect whether a qualified patient may make or rescind a 
259 request for medical aid in dying medication pursuant to this chapter, is not valid. 
260  (b) A qualified patient's act of making or rescinding a request for medical aid in dying 
261 shall not provide the sole basis for the appointment of a guardian or conservator. 
262  (c) A qualified patient’s act of self-administering medical aid in dying medication 
263 obtained pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute suicide or have an effect upon any life, 
264 health or accident insurance or annuity policy. 

15 of 18 265  (d) Actions taken by health care providers or other persons supporting a qualified patient 
266 exercising his or her rights pursuant to this chapter, including being present when the qualified 
267 patient self-administers medical aid in dying medication, shall not for any purpose, constitute 
268 elder abuse, neglect, assisted suicide, mercy killing or homicide under any civil or criminal law. 
269  (e) A person, health care provider or health care entity shall not be subject to criminal 
270 liability, licensing sanctions or other professional disciplinary action for actions taken in good 
271 faith compliance with this act.  
272  (f) State regulations, documents and reports shall not refer to the practice of medical aid 
273 in dying under this chapter as suicide or assisted suicide. 
274  Section 15. (a) A health care provider or health care entity may choose not to practice 
275 medical aid in dying. 
276  (b) A health care provider or health care entity may not subject an individual to censure, 
277 discipline, suspension, loss of license, loss of privileges, loss of membership or other penalty for 
278 participating or refusing to participate in providing medical aid in dying medication to a qualified 
279 patient under this chapter. 
280  (c) If a health care provider is unable or unwilling to carry out a patient's request under 
281 this chapter and the patient transfers care to a new health care provider, the prior health care 
282 provider shall transfer, upon request, a copy of the patient's relevant medical records to the new 
283 health care provider. 

16 of 18 284  (d) (1) A health care entity shall provide notice to the public by posting on their website 
285 if it prohibits providers from qualifying, prescribing or dispensing medication pursuant to this 
286 chapter while they are performing duties for the entity.  
287  (2) Health care providers and health care entities shall maintain and disclose upon request 
288 their written policies outlining the extent to which they refuse to participate in providing to a 
289 qualified patient any medical aid in dying medication under this chapter.  
290  (i) The commissioner of the department of public health shall develop and publish a 
291 standard form for health care providers and heath care entities to disclose said written policies.  
292  (3) The required consumer disclosure referenced in the preceding paragraph shall at 
293 minimum: 
294  (i) include information about this chapter; 
295  (ii) identify the specific services related to medical aid in dying in which the health care 
296 provider and health care entity refuse to participate; 
297  (iii) clarify any difference between institution-wide objections and those that may be 
298 raised by individual licensed providers who are employed or work on contract; 
299  (iv) describe the mechanism the provider will use to provide patients a referral to another 
300 provider or provider in the provider’s service area; 
301  (v) describe the provider’s policies and procedures relating to transferring patients to 
302 other providers; and 

17 of 18 303  (vi) inform consumers that the cost of transferring records will be borne by the 
304 transferring provider. 
305   Section 16. (a) Purposely or knowingly altering or forging a request for medical aid in 
306 dying medication under this chapter without authorization of the patient or concealing or 
307 destroying a rescission of a request for medical aid in dying medication shall be punishable as a 
308 felony if the act is done with the intent or effect of causing the patient's death. 
309  (b) An individual who coerces or exerts undue influence on a patient to request medical 
310 aid in dying medication, or to destroy a rescission of a request, shall be guilty of a felony 
311 punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 3 years or in the house of 
312 correction for not more than 2½ years or by a fine of not more than $1,000 or by both such fine 
313 and imprisonment. 
314  (c) Nothing in this chapter shall limit further liability for civil damages resulting from 
315 other negligent conduct or intentional misconduct by any individual. 
316  (d) The penalties in this chapter shall not preclude criminal penalties applicable under 
317 law for conduct inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. 
318  Section 17. A governmental entity that incurs costs resulting from a qualified patient self-
319 administering medical aid in dying medication in a public place while acting pursuant to this 
320 chapter may submit a claim against the estate of the patient to recover costs and reasonable 
321 attorney fees related to enforcing the claim. 
322  Section 18.  If an emergency medical provider finds a patient who has self-administered 
323 medical aid in dying medication, they shall follow standard resuscitation protocol. If a Medical 

18 of 18 324 Order for Life-Sustaining Treatment or other legally recognized do-not-resuscitate order is 
325 found, then the medical provider shall follow the directives of the form. 
326  Section 19. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize a physician or any 
327 other individual to end a patient's life by lethal injection, mercy killing, assisted suicide or active 
328 euthanasia. 
329  Section 20. The department of public health shall promulgate regulations to implement 
330 the provisions of this chapter. 
331  Section 21. If any part of this chapter is determined to be invalid, all valid parts that are 
332 severable from the invalid part shall remain in effect. If any part of this chapter is deemed invalid 
333 in one or more of its applications, such part shall remain in effect for all valid applications that 
334 are severable from the invalid applications.